Nebraska, session 109, LB1259.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB1259 LB1259
2026 2026
Section 1. Sections 1 to 21 of this act shall be known and may be
cited as the Grid Modernization Act.
Sec. 2. For purposes of the Grid Modernization Act:
(1) Board means the Nebraska Power Review Board;
(2) Closed private generation system means electric generating
facilities and associated infrastructure that:
(a) Is not connected to and operates independently from the
transmission system of a public power utility;
(b) Serves one or more customers with a minimum cumulative electric
demand of one hundred megawatts; and
(c) Serves one or more large-load customers through direct
connection;
(3) Connected generation system means electric generating facilities
and associated infrastructure that:
(a) Is connected to and operates in conjunction with the
transmission system of a public power utility;
(b) Serves one or more large-load customers through connection to
the transmission system of a public power utility; and
(c) Except as provided in a large-load contract, operates
independent of the generation resources of any public power utility;
(4) Evaluation means an assessment that:
(a) Estimates the impact of a large-scale service request on the
systems of a public power utility;
(b) Identifies any necessary:
(i) System modification or upgrades to the systems of the public
power utility to provide service as requested in a large-scale service
request;
(ii) Generation capacity; or
(iii) Transmission service requests;
(c) Provides cost estimates for any required improvements; and
(d) Establishes an estimated timeline for implementing any necessary
-2-

LB1259 LB1259
2026 2026
changes to systems;
(5) Large-load construction contract means a contract for the
construction of large-load facilities between:
(a) A public power utility or a large-scale generation provider; and
(b) A large-load customer;
(6) Large-load contract means a large-load construction contract or
large-load service contract;
(7) Large-load customer means a current or potential customer in the
service territory of a public power utility that requests electric
service under a large-scale service request or enters into a private
generation contract with a large-scale generation provider;
(8) Large-load facilities means facilities and resources reasonably
necessary, as determined in an evaluation, to provide safe and reliable
electric service as requested in a large-scale service request, including
the reasonably allocated share of facilities or upgrades necessary to
facilitate a transmission request from a public power utility or large-
scale generation provider to serve a large-scale service request;
(9) Large-load flexible tariff means a tariff:
(a) Pursuant to which a large-load customer will:
(i) Receive components of electric services from a large-scale
generation provider; or
(ii) Reduce demand at periods specified by a large-scale generation
provider; and
(b) Under which a large-load customer receives components of
available electric services from a public power utility to the extent:
(i) The public power utility's resources are reasonably expected to
be available and sufficient; and
(ii) As determined by an agreement with the public power utility or
tariffs approved by the board;
(10) Large-load incremental costs means all costs reasonably
necessary for:
-3-

LB1259 LB1259
2026 2026
(a) The design, engineering, procurement, construction, and
completion of large-load facilities and any activities required to
provide electric service under a large-scale service request; and
(b) The long-term operation and maintenance of large-load facilities
for the duration of any applicable service contract;
(11) Large-load service contract means a contract for the provision
of electric service for a large-scale service request between a large-
load customer and a public power utility or large-scale generation
provider;
(12) Large-scale generation provider means an entity that:
(a) Is not a public power utility;
(b) Is registered with the board in accordance with section 11 of
this act; and
(c) Owns, operates, or contracts for the output of one or more
qualifying generation resources intended to be used to supply certain
retail electric services to a large-load customer pursuant to a large-
load contract or a private generation contract;
(13) Large-scale service request means a request submitted to a
public power utility for:
(a) New electric service that is expected to reach a cumulative
demand of one hundred megawatts or greater within five years of the
requested initial start date; or
(b) Additional electric service that is expected to increase a
customer's total service level by one hundred megawatts or greater within
five years of the requested start date for the additional service;
(14) Private generation contract means a contract for the provision
of electric service through a closed private generation system between a
large-scale generation provider and a large-load customer requesting new
electric service that is expected to reach a cumulative demand of one
hundred megawatts or greater within five years of the requested initial
start date;
-4-

LB1259 LB1259
2026 2026
(15) Public power utility means public power districts, public power
and irrigation districts, municipalities, registered groups of
municipalities, electric cooperatives, electric membership associations,
joint entities formed under the Interlocal Cooperation Act, joint public
agencies formed under the Joint Public Agency Act, agencies formed under
the Municipal Cooperative Financing Act, and any other governmental
entities providing electric service; and
(16) Qualifying generation sources means one or more generation
resources that, in combination:
(a) If connected to the transmission system of a public power
utility:
(i) Meets or exceeds the resource adequacy standards of the public
power utility;
(ii) Includes sufficient resources and capacity to meet all
requirements imposed by the North American Electric Reliability
Corporation, the Southwest Power Pool, the Midwest Reliability
Organization, and the Western Area Power Administration; and
(iii) Is capable of satisfying the load and electricity requirements
of a large-load customer without drawing on any generation or services
provided by a public power utility except to the extent such services are
provided under a large-load contract; or
(b) If not connected to the transmission system of a public power
utility:
(i) Is capable of satisfying the load, transmission, and electricity
requirements of a large-load customer without drawing on any generation
or services provided by a public power utility; and
(ii) Meets any other reliability standards established by the board.
Sec. 3. The procedures and standards set forth in the Grid
Modernization Act shall govern:
(1) Large-scale service requests;
(2) Services sought, provided, or received under either a large-
-5-

LB1259 LB1259
2026 2026
scale service request or a private generation service request;
(3) Services provided through closed private generation systems
under private generation contracts; and
(4) The review and approval of large-load contracts and private
generation contracts.
Sec. 4. (1) Except for large-load customers seeking electric
service under a private generation contract, a large-load customer
seeking electric service shall submit a large-scale service request to
the public power utility serving the proposed location.
(2) A large-scale service request shall include:
(a) A customer's identifying information;
(b) The proposed location for electric service;
(c) The requested amount of electric demand in megawatts;
(d) A proposed service commencement date;
(e) Load profile information, including anticipated annual energy
usage, expected hours of operation, seasonal variations, peak demand
requirements, and any special service requirements;
(f) Information sufficient to demonstrate the financial capability
to complete the large-load customer's project that is the subject of the
large-scale service request; and
(g) Confirmation that the customer will not use the electric service
for resale.
(3) After submitting a large-scale service request and before
entering into a large-load contract, a customer shall ensure that all
information submitted under this section remains current and shall
promptly notify the public power utility of any material changes to
information submitted under this section.
Sec. 5. (1) A public power utility that receives a large-scale
service request shall:
(a) Acknowledge receipt of the request;
(b) Notify the customer of any missing required information within
-6-

LB1259 LB1259
2026 2026
fifteen business days after the processing start date of the utility
described in subsection (2) of this section; and
(c) Complete an evaluation as soon as reasonably practicable after
the processing start date provided in subsection (2) of this section, but
no more than six months after such date.
(2) The processing start date of a public power utility for large-
scale service requests, including conducting evaluations, shall be no
later than:
(a) April 1, for requests received after September 30 of the prior
year and on or before March 31; or
(b) October 1, for requests received after March 31 and on or before
September 30.
(3) During the evaluation process, the public power utility shall
provide the customer with regular updates and notify the customer when
the evaluation is completed.
(4) Within fifteen business days after completing an evaluation, the
public power utility shall provide to the customer a written service
proposal that includes:
(a) Whether the public power utility can provide the requested
service within the time frame required by the customer;
(b) The estimated large load incremental costs that will be
allocated to the customer, based on the information provided by the
customer;
(c) Any required system upgrades, improvements, or transmission
service requests;
(d) The estimated timeline for commencing the requested electric
service; and
(e) The proposed terms and conditions of service, including
provisions for addressing long-term operation and maintenance costs for
large load facilities.
(5) A public power utility:
-7-

LB1259 LB1259
2026 2026
(a) May charge reasonable fees for costs incurred in evaluating a
large-scale service request and necessary subsequent or related
assessments; and
(b) Is not required to begin work on an evaluation until the
customer pays applicable fees and provides the information required for
the public power utility to conduct an evaluation.
Sec. 6. (1) Electric service for a large-scale service request
shall be provided only under one or more large-load contracts with a
public power utility, a large-scale generation provider, or a combination
of both.
(2) A large-load customer shall:
(a) Contract for all of the customer's projected electrical
requirements under the large-scale service request; and
(b) Maintain contracts with resources or load-shedding capabilities
sufficient to meet the customer's actual electrical requirements at all
times.
(3) A large-load contract with a public power utility shall:
(a) Require that all large-load incremental costs are allocated to
and paid by the large-load customer;
(b) Comply with all system requirements;
(c) Require the large-load customer to maintain financial security
sufficient to cover the customer's obligations;
(d) Specify points of interconnection, power delivery points, the
amount of electrical capacity contracted for, the length of service, and
any arrangements for backup power supply;
(e) Provide curtailment provisions if the large-load customer's
demand exceeds the amount of contractually supported demand;
(f) Identify the generation resources that the public power utility
will use to serve the large-load customer; and
(g) Include provisions addressing the allocation and payment of
long-term operation and maintenance costs for large-load facilities.
-8-

LB1259 LB1259
2026 2026
(4) A large-load contract with a large-scale generation provider
that provides service through a connected generation system shall:
(a) Ensure that all large-load incremental costs are allocated to
and paid by the large-load customer;
(b) Comply with all system requirements;
(c) Specify points of interconnection, power delivery points, the
amount of electrical capacity contracted for, the length of service, and
any arrangements for backup power supply; and
(d) Provide curtailment provisions if the large-load customer's
demand exceeds the real-time dispatch, net of transmission losses of the
large-scale generation provider's resource under the large-load contract.
(5) Except as explicitly provided in a large-load contract, a public
power utility shall have no duty to serve a large-load customer and is
not required to provide backup power.
(6) A public power utility shall not be required to commence design
and construction of large-load facilities until after executing a large-
load construction contract and obtaining board approval in accordance
with section 8 of this act.
(7) A public power utility or large-scale generation provider shall:
(a) Obtain board approval in accordance with section 8 of this act
before providing electric service under a large-load contract; and
(b) Negotiate the terms of a large-load contract with a large-load
customer on a case-by-case basis.
Sec. 7. A customer seeking to receive electric service through a
closed private generation system:
(1) May negotiate directly with a large-scale generation provider;
and
(2) Is not required to submit a large-scale service request to a
public power utility.
Sec. 8. (1) Within fifteen business days after executing a large-
load contract, a public power utility or a large-scale generation
-9-

LB1259 LB1259
2026 2026
provider executing the contract shall submit an application for approval
or denial of the contract to the board. Such application shall include:
(a) A copy of the large-load contract; and
(b) Evidence sufficient to demonstrate compliance with subsection
(2) of this section.
(2) The board shall approve the application and contract if the
board finds by a preponderance of the evidence that:
(a) The contract complies with the requirements of the Grid
Modernization Act;
(b) The large-load customer bears all incremental costs reasonably
attributable to receiving the requested electric service; and
(c) Existing ratepayers do not bear costs reasonably attributable to
providing electric service for the large-load customer.
(3) Board review of an application and contract under this section
is limited to review of compliance with subsection (2) of this section
and shall not include review of other contract terms.
(4) The board shall approve or deny an application and contract
submitted pursuant to this section within sixty days after receipt of the
application.
(5) The board may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to
expedite the review of applications for approval or denial of large-load
contracts under this section.
Sec. 9. (1) Subject to subsection (2) of this section, a public
power utility shall have sole right to provide electric service to a
large-load customer in the public power utility's service territory.
(2) A public power utility shall not be required to provide electric
service:
(a) In response to a large-scale service request if:
(i) The large-load customer has not complied with the Grid
Modernization Act;
(ii) The public power utility cannot provide the requested service
-10-

LB1259 LB1259
2026 2026
within the timeframe required by the large-scale service request;
(iii) The large-load customer and the public power utility cannot
agree upon terms for a large-load contract;
(iv) The large-load customer fails or refuses to comply with the
requirements of a large-load contract; or
(v) The large-load customer is receiving service from a large-scale
generation provider; or
(b) To a large-load customer that receives service pursuant to a
private generation contract.
(3) A public power utility that does not agree to terms with a
large-load customer for a large-load contract:
(a) Has no right or duty to serve the large-load customer;
(b) Is not required to provide ancillary or backup services to the
large-load customer; and
(c) Is not required to provide any services to a large-scale
generation provider.
Sec. 10. (1) A large-load customer may enter into a large-load
contract with a large-scale generation provider if the following
conditions are met:
(a) A public power utility fails to complete an evaluation or
provide a written response within the time periods described in section 5
of this act; or
(b) The public power utility and large-load customer cannot agree to
a large-load contract within ninety days after the day on which the
large-load customer receives the evaluation described in this title,
unless the public power utility and the large-load customer mutually
agree to a longer period of time.
(2) After submitting a large-scale service request, a large-load
customer:
(a) May negotiate a contract with one or more large-scale generation
providers; and
-11-

LB1259 LB1259
2026 2026
(b) Shall not execute a contract with a large-scale generation
provider unless the conditions described in subsection (1) of this
section are met.
Sec. 11. (1) Before providing electric service to a large-load
customer, a large-scale generation provider shall:
(a) Register with the board;
(b) Maintain any reasonable technical and financial qualifications
required by the board;
(c) Provide electric service only through qualifying generation
resources;
(d) Post security as reasonably negotiated with a large-load
customer, as required by contract with a transmission provider, or as
required by the board for services to be provided by a public power
utility;
(e) Submit to the board:
(i) Proof of financial capability as reasonably negotiated with the
large-load customer;
(f) The provider's operational history and experience;
(g) A description of the portfolio of qualifying generation
resources the provider intends to use to serve the large-load customer
without reliance on any public power utility, cooperative utility,
municipal utility, or other utility except as provided under a large-load
contract; and
(h) Documentation of all required permits obtained for generation
resources, including any environmental permits, and the estimated impact
of the generation sources on the state implementation plan for air
quality.
Sec. 12. (1) A large-scale generation provider that fails to
satisfy the requirements of the Grid Modernization Act:
(a) Shall not initiate new service to a large-load customer;
(b) Shall remedy any deficiency under the Grid Modernization Act
-12-

LB1259 LB1259
2026 2026
within ninety days after the day the deficiency arises; and
(c) May have reasonable conditions imposed by the board on the
provider's registration under the Grid Modernization Act.
(2) If the board suspends or revokes a large-scale generation
provider's registration under the Grid Modernization Act:
(a) The provider shall not continue to provide electric service to a
large-load customer after the large-load customer has been given a
reasonable opportunity to secure alternative service arrangements; and
(b) The large-load customer shall not receive electric service from
another large-scale generation provider or a public power utility except
pursuant to a large-load contract approved by the board.
Sec. 13. (1) If the provision of electric service to a large load
customer requires transmission service:
(a) The public power utility or the large-scale generation provider
shall submit a transmission service request to the transmission service
provider;
(b) To the fullest extent allowed under applicable federal law and
regulations, the large-scale generation provider or large-load customer
shall:
(i) Pay for:
(A) Any interconnection-related or transmission-related studies;
(B) Any identified necessary interconnection upgrades, transmission
upgrades, network upgrades, distribution system upgrades, or other system
upgrades; and
(C) The transmission service rates in the transmission service
provider's open access transmission tariff; and
(ii) Pay and provide for any necessary ancillary services, balancing
services, and backup services.
(2) Nothing in this section shall be construed to:
(a) Conflict with or superseded any applicable federal law,
regulation, or order regarding transmission cost allocation; or
-13-

LB1259 LB1259
2026 2026
(b) Require cost allocation methods inconsistent with Federal Energy
Regulatory Commission requirements or orders.
(3) The board shall review transmission cost allocation methods
consistent with the requirements of federal law and regulations and may
adopt and promulgate rules and regulations for implementation of this
section.
Sec. 14. (1) A large-load customer may enter into a private
generation contract for all needed electric services from a large-scale
generation provider through a closed private generation system under
terms and conditions acceptable to the large-load customer and the large-
scale generation provider.
(2) Any closed private generation system or large-scale generation
provider that provides electric service on or through a closed private
generation system in accordance with the Grid Modernization Act:
(a) Is exempt from any other powers of the board over public power
utilities under state law;
(b) Shall ensure all generation, transmission, and related
facilities remain wholly separate from facilities owned or operated by
any public power utility except to the extent authorized by the Grid
Modernization Act; and
(c) May connect to or receive services from a public power utility
only pursuant to a contract consistent with state law and approved by the
board under the Grid Modernization Act.
(3) A closed private generation system may operate prior to
receiving a request from a public power utility to purchase power
generated by the system and prior to board approval of a large-load
service contract.
(4) The provision of electric service to a large-load customer on or
through a closed private generation system shall utilize qualifying
generation resources.
(5) The board may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to
-14-

LB1259 LB1259
2026 2026
require appropriate notices and warnings regarding separation from the
systems of the public power utility.
Sec. 15. (1) A large-load customer may obtain all needed electric
services from a large-scale generation provider through a connected
generation system consistent with the Grid Modernization Act.
(2) A large-scale generation provider may provide service on or
through a connected generation system if the provider:
(a) Registers with the board in accordance with section 11 of this
act;
(b) Uses only qualifying generation resources;
(c) Maintains sufficient generation capacity to serve all contracted
loads;
(d) Has submitted system design, operational information, emergency
response procedures, and notification of any changes in system
configuration or operation to the board; and
(e) Maintains commercial liability insurance required by state law.
(3) A large-scale generation provider that provides service on or
through a connected generation system consistent with the requirements of
this act is exempt from any other powers of the board over public power
utilities under state law.
(4) A closed private generation system or a large-scale generation
provider that provides service through a closed private generation system
may connect to the interstate transmission of a transmission service
provider only if:
(a) The closed private generation system is interconnected to the
interstate transmission system pursuant to the open access transmission
tariff of the transmission service provider approved by Federal Energy
Regulatory Commission; and
(b) The board determines that the closed private generation system
or large-scale generation provider has complied with the Grid
Modernization Act for the provision of service on or through a connected
-15-

LB1259 LB1259
2026 2026
generation system.
(5) A closed private generation system or a large-scale generation
provider that provides service through a closed private generation system
may receive services from a public power utility only if it has complied
with subsection (4) of this section and if it has an agreement with the
public power utility that has been approved by the board.
(6) A public power utility:
(a) Is not required to purchase or accept any power from a connected
generation system;
(b) Shall not accept power from a connected generation system unless
explicitly authorized in an agreement that has been approved by the
board; and
(c) May elect to purchase up to ten percent of the power generated
by a large-scale generation provider. Such election shall be made in
writing no later than the deadline for the board to approve or deny a
large-load contract as provided in subsection (4) of section 8 of this
act unless otherwise agreed to in writing by the large-scale generation
provider and the public power utility. Election by a public power utility
to purchase power under this subsection shall not be grounds to delay or
deny approval of a large-load contract or to prevent operation of a
closed generation system.
Sec. 16. A large-load customer shall pay all large-load incremental
costs necessary to receive electric service, including the costs of:
(1) Generation resources;
(2) Distribution system upgrades;
(3) To the extent permitted and applicable by federal law and
approved by the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission:
(a) Transmission system improvements, including network upgrades;
and
(b) Interconnection facilities;
(4) Transmission service; and
-16-

LB1259 LB1259
2026 2026
(5) Other necessary infrastructure.
Sec. 17. (1) A large-scale generation provider shall:
(a) Maintain separate accounting records for all investments,
revenues, and expenses associated with large-scale service requests using
generally accepted accounting principles;
(b) Take reasonable measures to ensure costs are properly allocated
between large-load customers and other customers;
(c) Provide all contracted energy services without reliance on any
public power utility except as provided under a large-load contract;
(d) Meet all applicable North American Electric Reliability
Corporation standards; and
(e) Maintain reasonable commercial liability insurance as determined
by contract or the board.
(2) A public power utility shall:
(a) Maintain separate accounting records for all investments,
revenues, and expenses associated with large-scale service requests using
generally accepted accounting principles; and
(b) Take reasonable measures to ensure costs are properly allocated
between large-load service and other operations.
(3) All revenues and large-load incremental costs associated with a
large-scale service request shall be excluded from any rate
determinations by the board.
(4) In connection with any rate determination or other appropriate
proceeding before the board, a public power utility shall provide:
(a) Operational data identifying when and to what extent the
generation resources identified in a large-load contract were dispatched
to serve large-load customers;
(b) An identification of the timing, magnitude, and duration of:
(i) The public power utility's dispatch of the resources described
in subdivision (4)(a) of this section;
(ii) Any periods in which the amount of the electric service of
-17-

LB1259 LB1259
2026 2026
large-load customers exceeded the dispatch of resources described in
subdivision (4)(a) of this section; and
(iii) Any periods in which the dispatch of resources described in
subdivision (4)(a) of this section exceeded the amount of the electric
service of large-load customers;
(c) The method by which costs for the provision of electric service
from the public power utility to a large-load customer will be excluded
from rates paid by retail customers; and
(d) Any other information the board requires to ensure that the
costs associated with electric service to a large-load customer are
excluded from the rates paid for by retail customers.
(5) A public power utility shall not be required to publicly
disclose specific revenue information from individual large-load
customers in any proceeding described in subsection (4) of this section.
Sec. 18. (1) The board shall:
(a) Investigate a large-load flexible tariff for public power
utilities; and
(b) Adopt a large-load flexible tariff if the board determines that
the tariff is in the public interest and fair and reasonable.
(2) In conducting an investigation for a large-load flexible tariff,
the board shall consider:
(a) The conditions and timing for the tariff;
(b) The means of determining the rates, terms, and conditions
pursuant to which a public power utility may provide electric services to
a large-load customer; and
(c) The conditions under which a public power utility may require a
large-load customer to reduce or eliminate electric usage under the
large-load flexible tariff.
Sec. 19. Beginning in 2029 and ever three years thereafter, the
board shall:
(1) Conduct a review of the Grid Modernization Act;
-18-

LB1259 LB1259
2026 2026
(2) Conduct an investigation with stakeholder input and public
comments and prepare a report that includes:
(a) Data on overall use of and participation with the Grid
Modernization Act;
(b) Analysis of impacts of the Grid Modernization Act on electrical
rates;
(c) Assessment of transmission system reliability; and
(d) Recommendations regarding whether to expand the Grid
Modernization Act or modify the act; and
(3) Provide the report described in subsection (2) of this section
and any recommendations to the Natural Resources Committee of the
Legislature.
Sec. 20. (1) The board shall:
(a) Adopt and promulgate rules and regulations for the allocation of
transmission costs between large-load customers and retail customers for
all large-load contracts executed on or after January 1, 2027;
(b) Retain a qualified independent consultant with expertise in
transmission cost allocation methodologies to:
(i) Analyze potential methodologies for transmission cost
allocation, taking into account the factors listed in subsection (2) of
this section; and
(ii) Make recommendations to the board; and
(c) Adopt and promulgate such rules and regulations no later than
January 1, 2027.
(2) In developing rules and regulations pursuant to subsection (1)
of this section, the board shall consider the following factors:
(a) Federal Energy Regulatory Commission policies and precedents
regarding transmission cost allocation;
(b) The projected increase in electricity demand from large-load
customers;
(c) The incremental transmission costs required to serve large-load
-19-

LB1259 LB1259
2026 2026
customers;
(d) The economic development benefits associated with serving large-
load customers;
(e) The need to maintain fair and reasonable rates for retail
customers;
(f) The extent to which new large-load facilities are required
specifically for service of large-load customers;
(g) The extent to which large-load customers utilize existing
transmission infrastructure;
(h) Methods to apportion costs based on cost causation and system
benefits; and
(i) Any other factors the board determines are relevant to
establishing a fair and reasonable allocation of transmission costs.
(3) The board may establish different cost allocation methodologies
based on the timing of large-load customer interconnection, the size of
the load being served, the cost causation attributable to various
customer classes, the benefits accruing to various customer classes, or
other relevant distinctions.
(4) Nothing in this section limits the board's existing authority to
determine fair and reasonable rates.
(5)(a) The board shall impose and collect a fee from each large-load
customer that submits a large-scale service request to cover the cost of:
(i) The retention of qualified independent consultants and experts
by the board to evaluate large-scale service requests and large-load
contracts; and
(ii) Any other reasonable costs incurred in conducting proceedings
and evaluations under the Grid Modernization Act.
(b) The fee shall be:
(i) Assessed on a semi-annual basis established by the board;
(ii) Determined based on the anticipated needs given the number and
complexity of requests received; and
-20-

LB1259 LB1259
2026 2026
(iii) Proportionately allocated among large-load customers with
pending requests.
(c) All fees collected under this subsection shall be used
exclusively to cover the costs described in subdivision (5)(a) of this
section.
Sec. 21. The board may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations
necessary to carry out the Grid Modernization Act.
-21-